Wyoming, session 2025, SF0109.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-2-202(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xli), 21-3-110(a) by creating a new paragraph
(xliv), 21-4-301 by creating new subsections (c) through
(f) and 21-4-303 are amended to read:
SF0109

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0329

21-2-202. Duties of the state superintendent.

(a) In addition to any other duties assigned by law,
the state superintendent shall:

(xli) Annually publish on the department's
official website the information reported by each school
district board of trustees under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xliv).

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:

(xliv) Adopt policies and procedures allowing
any pupil to enroll in any public school within the pupil's
resident school district as required by W.S. 21-4-301 and
in accordance with this paragraph. A pupil shall apply to
be enrolled in a public school within a pupil's resident
school district on a form and in the manner prescribed by
the school district board of trustees. Priority shall be
given to pupils who reside within the school attendance
SF0109

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0329
area as defined by W.S. 21-4-301(c)(ii) and pupils who have
siblings currently enrolled in that public school. Any
parent or guardian aggrieved by a decision of the school
district under this paragraph may seek review in accordance
with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

21-4-301. Schools to be free and accessible to all
children; minimum school year; open enrollment.

(c) Commencing with school year 2026-2027 and each
school year thereafter, the board of trustees of each
school district within the state shall provide for the
enrollment of any pupil in any public school within the
pupil's resident school district, except as otherwise
provided in subsection (d) of this section. For purposes of
this subsection:

(i) "Resident school district" means the school
district where the pupil resides;

(ii) "School attendance area" means a geographic
area designed by a school district to determine which
SF0109

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0329
public school a pupil is eligible to attend within their
resident school district.

(d) The board of trustees of each school district may
decline to enroll a pupil in a public school within the
pupil's resident school district for the following reasons:

(i) The public school does not have sufficient
capacity at the appropriate grade level as determined by
the school district; or

(ii) The pupil has been suspended or expelled or
is in the process of being suspended or expelled under W.S.
21-4-305 and 21-4-306.

(e) In implementing the provisions of subsection (c)
of this section, no school district board of trustees shall
be required to establish and offer any particular program
in a public school if the program is not currently offered
in the school.

(f) The board of trustees of each school district
shall publish the number of vacancies open for enrollment
SF0109

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0329
in each grade level for each public school within its
district on its official website not less than one (1) time
every twelve (12) weeks.

21-4-303. Right not denied on account of sex, race,
religion, socioeconomic status, ethnicity, disability or
residential address.

No child shall be denied the right to attend the public
schools of this state on account of sex, race,
socioeconomic status, ethnicity, disability, residential
address or religion.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0109